Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska61-214
Water division No. 2; boundaries.

Water division No. 2 shall consist of (1) all lands that may be watered from the Loup, White, Niobrara, and Elkhorn Rivers and their tributaries and (2) all other lands of the state not included in any other water division.

Laws 1895, c. 69, § 3, p. 245;

Laws 1911, c. 153, § 2, p. 498;

R.S.1913, § 3380;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 1, § 12, p. 833;

C.S.1922, § 8417;

C.S.1929, § 46-512;

R.S.1943, § 46-217;

R.S.1943, (1998), § 46-217;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 14.

Snake River is within the Niobrara River basin or watershed. Ainsworth Irr. Dist. v. Bejot, 170 Neb. 257, 102 N.W.2d 416 (1960).